Hawaii statutes.
§660-6 Form of writ. The court or
judge to whom the complaint is made shall, without delay, award and issue the
writ unless it appears from the application that the person detained is not
entitled thereto or an order to show cause is issued under section 660-7. The
writ of habeas corpus may be in the following form:

State of Hawaii.

To......................................greeting.

We command you that immediately upon the
receipt of this writ, you have and produce before.....at.....the body of.....who
is unjustly imprisoned and restrained of his liberty, as it is said, to do and
receive what shall then and there be considered concerning him in this behalf.
And have you there this writ, with your doings thereon.

Witness the Honorable.....at.....this.....day
of.................20....

[Seal]

................................

[L 1870, c 32, §4; RL 1925, §2730; RL 1935, §4315;
RL 1945, §10356; am L 1953, c 101, §3; RL 1955, §239-6; HRS §660-6; am L 1972,
c 90, §5(d)]

Revision Note

The date "19...." in the form was changed to
"20...." pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next